Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-138
Ordinances; how proved.

All ordinances of the city may be proved by a certificate of the clerk under the seal of the city, and when printed or published in a book or pamphlet form, and purporting to be published or printed by authority of the city council, shall be read and received in all courts and places without further proof.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. I, § 37, p. 419;

C.S.1922, § 3525;

C.S.1929, § 14-138;

R.S.1943, § 14-138.